Hawaii statutes.
§163D-9 Bonds. (a) The corporation,
with the approval of the governor, may issue, from time to time, revenue bonds
in amounts not exceeding the total amount of bonds authorized to be issued by
the legislature for the purpose of constructing, acquiring, remodeling,
furnishing, and equipping any project facility, including the acquisition of
the site thereof; acquiring agricultural lands through purchase to sustain and
preserve viable agricultural enterprises within a contiguous geographic area;
or acquiring agricultural lands for the protection of agricultural lands,
public land banking, or the promotion of farm ownership and diversified
agriculture.

(b) All revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant
to part III of chapter 39, except as provided in this chapter.

(c) The revenue bonds shall be issued in the
name of the corporation and not in the name of the State. The final maturity
date of the revenue bonds may be any date not exceeding thirty years from the
date of issuance. [L 1994, c 264, pt of §1; am L 2008, c 234, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next